North Carolina, session 2025, SB1030.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143B-344.46 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-344.46. Weatherization Assistance Program and Heating/Air Repair and
Replacement Program.
The State Energy Office within the Department may shall administer the Weatherization
Assistance Program for Low-Income Families and the Heating/Air Repair and Replacement
Program functions. The Weatherization Assistance Program for Low-Income Families shall
integrate health and safety measures to reduce energy costs, improve indoor air quality, and
address health risks such as asthma and other respiratory illnesses. The Department shall adopt
rules to ensure the effective delivery of weatherization assistance and to implement this section.
The rules shall include provisions for soliciting proposals from potential sponsors, prioritizing
projects, allocating funds, and reporting requirements. The Department may use funds from
federal sources, State appropriations, utility contributions, and other available sources to fund the
programs. Nothing in this Part shall be construed as obligating the General Assembly to
appropriate funds for the Program or as entitling any person to services under the Program."
SECTION 2. Part 33 of Article 7 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-344.47. Definitions; proposals and allocation of funds; community scaled projects.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Applicant. – A resident or owner, or designated agent of an owner, of a
dwelling unit for which program services are sought.
(2) Community scaled project. – A weatherization or healthy housing
improvement project that includes multiple dwelling units that are located in
the same neighborhood or area where overlapping factors such as
environmental, social, or economic conditions may adversely impact
residents, as determined by the Department.
(3) Department. – The Department of Environmental Quality.
(4) Healthy housing improvements. – Improvements that increase the health and
safety of a home by integrating energy efficiency activities and indoor
environmental quality measures.
(5) Secretary. – The Secretary of Environmental Quality.
*S1030-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Sponsor. – Any entity that submits a proposal under G.S. 143B-344.46,
including any local community action agency, tribal nation, community
service agency, or any other participating agency or any public utility,
municipality, or any combination of such entities that jointly submits a
proposal.
(7) Sponsor match. – The share of the cost of weatherization or healthy housing
improvements to be paid by the sponsor.
(8) Weatherization. – The modification of homes and home heating and cooling
systems to improve heating and cooling efficiency by caulking and weather
stripping, as well as insulating ceilings, attics, walls, and floors.
(9) Weatherizing entity. – Any entity that has been approved by the Department
and that bears the responsibility for ensuring the performance of
weatherization or healthy housing improvements in accordance with this Part.
(b) Proposals and Allocation of Funds. –
(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose,
the Department shall solicit proposals for low-income weatherization
programs from potential sponsors. A proposal shall state the amount of the
sponsor match, the amount requested, the name of the weatherizing agency,
and any other information required by the Department.
(2) A sponsor may propose to utilize grant awards and matching funds to
weatherize or make healthy housing improvements to residential housing or
to undertake community scaled projects.
(3) A sponsor may not use its own funds or funds provided by landlords,
charitable groups, government programs, or other sources to use as the
sponsor match for previously started weatherization and community scaled
projects in order to secure funds provided under this section.
(4) A proposal must provide that full levels of all cost-effective, structurally
feasible, sustainable residential weatherization materials, measures, and
practices, as determined by the Department, will be installed when a
low-income household is weatherized or improved, unless the proposal is for
a community scaled project.
(5) The Department may in its discretion accept, accept in part, or reject proposals
submitted under this section.
(6) The Department may prioritize allocating funds to projects that maximize
energy efficiency, extend the usable life of an affordable home, and improve
the health and safety of its residents.
(7) When allocating funds, the Department may, to the extent feasible, consider
local and State benefits, including pledged sponsor match; available energy
efficiency, repair, and rehabilitation funds from other sources; the
preservation of affordable housing; and balance of participation in proportion
to population amount low-income households.
(c) Community Scaled Projects. –
(1) A sponsor may submit a proposal to the Department for the use of grant and
matching funds for a community scaled project. The proposal may include full
or partial weatherization, energy efficiency measures, or structural
rehabilitation and repairs for multiple dwelling units within the same
community.
(2) A sponsor must identify priority communities to be served by the community
scaled project using indicators determined by the Department, which shall
include data reflecting environmental health disparities, housing vulnerability,
and pollution exposure.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1030-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The Department may consider publicly available socioeconomic data to
prioritize community scaled project proposals that serve areas with
low-income households.
(4) The Department shall approve or deny a proposal pursuant to this subsection
within 90 days of the receipt of the completed application."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for the Weatherization Assistance Program for Low-Income
Families, as enacted by this act. Up to ten percent (10%) of these funds may be used for
administrative costs.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective December 1, 2026. The
remainder of this act is effective July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 1030-First Edition Page 3